District of Columbia statutes.
31-757

Failure to give notice.

If the reciprocal insurance company complies substantially and in good faith with the notice requirements of this subchapter, the reciprocal insurance company’s failure to give any member or members any required notice shall not impair the validity of any action taken under this subchapter.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-112, § 8, 45 DCR 1792
1981 Ed., § 35-3747.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-751.